Utah statutes.
78B-6-503.5.   Other property which may be taken -- State as plaintiff.
(1)  Subject to Subsections (2) and (3), property which may be taken under
this part includes property possessed by the federal government unless the
property was acquired by the federal government with the consent of the
Legislature and in accordance with the United States Constitution Article I,
Section 8, Clause 17.
(2)  The state shall be the plaintiff described in Section 78B-6-507 in an
action to condemn property described in Subsection (1).
(3)  The following do not apply to an action authorized under Subsection (1):
(a)  Section 78B-6-505;
(b)  Section 78B-6-520;
(c)  Section 78B-6-521; and
(d)  Title 57, Chapter 12, Relocation Assistance.
